District of Columbia statutes.
22-4329

Inspection of business or vocational establishments requiring a license or permit or any vehicle, boat, market box, market stall or cold storage plant, during business hours.

Authorized officers and employees of the government of the United States or of the government of the District of Columbia are, for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter and the regulations promulgated by the Council of the District of Columbia under the authority of this chapter, empowered, during business hours, to inspect any building or premises in or on which any business, trade, vocation, or occupation requiring a license or permit is carried on, or any vehicle, boat, market box, market stall, or cold-storage plant. No person shall refuse to permit any such inspection.

History

Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 814, Pub. L. 85-730, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1629.
1973 Ed., § 22-1629.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(204) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.